test/src/morphology/V-mudzo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - muʼdžõ: # Verb 'to read' - full paradigm
     muʼdžõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mudžūb
     muʼdžõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: mudžūd
     muʼdžõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mudžūb
     muʼdžõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: mudžõm
     muʼdžõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: mudžõt
     muʼdžõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mudžõbõd
